Massachusetts, session 194th, H4253.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 8 of chapter 452 of the acts of 1948 is hereby amended by striking
out the words “the first Monday of January” and inserting in place thereof the following words:-
the first weekday after the second day in January.
SECTION 2. Section 9 of said chapter 452 is hereby amended by striking out the words
“the first Monday in January” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- the first
weekday after the second day in January.
SECTION 3. Said section 9 of said chapter 452 is hereby further amended by striking out
the words “the first Monday of the January” and inserting in place thereof the following words:-
the first weekday after the second day in January.
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect starting with the elected terms and the municipal
year that begins on January 5, 2026.
of 1